Rhode Island statutes. Title 41 Sports, Racing, and Athletics
Chapter 5.1 Commission on Professional Boxing and Wrestling

41-5.1-1.
Composition of commission — Expenses.

There shall be a commission on professional boxing and wrestling, consisting of five (5) qualified electors, three (3) of whom shall be appointed by the speaker of the house, not more than two (2) from the same political party; one by the president of the senate; and one by the governor. All members shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority. The commission shall serve without compensation, but shall be allowed their travel and necessary expenses in accordance with the rates from time to time established by the legislative department in its rules and regulations and may expend such sums of money as may be appropriated from time to time by the general assembly.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 399, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

42-118-1

; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 92; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 20, § 22.

41-5.1-2.
Duties of commission.

It shall be the duty of the commission on boxing and wrestling to study professional boxing and wrestling and make recommendations for the regulation thereof to the division of gaming and athletics licensing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 399, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 42-118-2; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 20, § 22.

41-5.1-3.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 399, § 1; G.L. 1956, § 42-118-3; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 82, § 17, effective June 17, 2015; P.L. 2015, ch. 105, § 17, effective June 19, 2015.